Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 38

General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 1965, No. 381, § 4: Mar. 19, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly that the Internal Revenue Service of the United States Treasury Department draws checks or warrants in payment of refunds of federal income tax in favor of and in the names of both spouses with respect to whom joint federal income tax returns have been filed irrespective of the fact of death of one of such spouses and further will not honor such a check or warrant indorsed by the survivor only in the absence of an appropriate court order; that this procedure works a great hardship on survivors, especially in cases where there is no administration on the estate of the deceased spouse; and that enactment of this measure will enable survivors to receive the refunds due them with reasonable expedition. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

28-38-101. Joint income tax refunds.

The survivor of spouses with respect to whom a joint federal income tax return has been filed, upon the death of the other, shall be entitled to receive any refund of tax due from the Internal Revenue Service in his or her own right upon making proof of the death of the other.

Proof of death for the purpose of this section may be made by exhibiting a death certificate of a coroner, licensed physician, or appropriate state agency, or by affidavit of the survivor.

It shall be unnecessary for a survivor who has complied with the terms of this section to secure any court order to entitle him or her to receive the federal income tax refund, but he or she shall have a right to a United States Treasury check or warrant for the refund drawn in his or her favor solely.

This section contemplates the situation where an income tax return is filed while both husband and wife are still living and thereafter one of them dies, not the situation where one spouse has already died when the return is filed. Foster v. Schmiedeskamp, 260 Ark. 898, 545 S.W.2d 624 (1977).

Cross References. Life interests and remainders, determination of present value, §18-2-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1951, No. 255, § 15: Mar. 19, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly has ascertained that there is a likelihood of misconstruction of certain provisions of the Probate Code, and that an urgent need exists for clarification thereof and certain additions thereto in order that the law relating to proceedings in probate may be construed and administered in a uniform manner throughout the State, in accordance with the legislative intent; for the accomplishment of which purposes this Act is adopted. An emergency is therefore declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, welfare and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

ALR.

Prior institution of annulment proceedings or other attack on validity of one's marriage as barring or estopping one from entitlement to property rights as surviving spouse. 31 A.L.R.4th 1190.

Rights of inheritance as between kindred of whole and half blood. 47 A.L.R.4th 561.

Am. Jur. 23 Am. Jur. 2d, Desc. & D., § 109 et seq.

31 Am. Jur. 2d, Exec. & Ad., § 324 et seq.

Ark. L. Rev.

Acts 1949 General Assembly — Act 140 The Probate Code, 3 Ark. L. Rev. 375.

Probate Code Amendments, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 377.

Federal Estate Tax: Surviving Spouse Support Allowances and the Marital Deduction, 21 Ark. L. Rev. 131.

The New Arkansas Inheritance Laws: A Step into the Present with an Eye to the Future, 23 Ark. L. Rev. 313.

Estate Planning with Disclaimers in Arkansas, 27 Ark. L. Rev. 411.

C.J.S. 26B C.J.S., Desc. & D., § 23 et seq.

34 C.J.S., Exec. & Ad., § 344 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Brantley and Effland, Inheritance, The Share of the Surviving Spouse, and Wills: Arkansas Law and the Uniform Probate Code Compared, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 361.

Note, Constitutional Law — Equal Protection — Arkansas' Gender-Based Statutes on Dower, Election, Statutory Allowances, and Homestead Are Unconstitutional, Hess v. Wims, 272 Ark. 43, 613 S.W.2d 85 (1981); Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372, 18 A.L.R.4th 903 (1981), 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 361.

Legislative Survey, Decedents' Estates, 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 591.

Survey of Arkansas Law, Decedents' Estates, 5 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 135.

Averill & Brantley, A Comparison of Arkansas's Current Law Concerning Succession, Wills, and Other Donative Transfers with Article II of the 1990 Uniform Probate Code, 17 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 631.

The provisions of subsections (a)-(c) of this section shall be cumulative, and the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall apply as against creditors and distributees.

Ark. L. Rev.

Comment, Arkansas Marriage: A Partnership Between a Husband and Wife, or a Safety Net for Support?, 61 Ark. L. Rev. 735.

The portion of this section which conferred dower rights upon a widow, but did not confer such rights upon a surviving husband was a gender based statute which did not serve an important governmental function and thus was unconstitutional, since it violated the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution. Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372 (1981), overruled in part, Beck v. Merritt, 280 Ark. 331, 657 S.W.2d 549 (1983) (decision under prior law).

Where widow of decedent elected to take against the will and petitioned for statutory allowances under this section, which provided allowances of $2,000.00 plus $500.00 sustenance to a widow, but not a widower, there was no way under the facts of the case and the statutory language to extend benefits to the disfavored class, and thus benefits had to be denied to both widowers and widows by declaring this section unconstitutional as applied. Hess v. Wims, 272 Ark. 43, 613 S.W.2d 85 (1981) (decision under prior law).

A devisee and beneficiary of a decedent's will who was not an heir and who stood to lose financially if the decedent's wife claimed against the will pursuant to §28-39-401 and received statutory allowances provided for in this section, had standing to challenge the constitutionality of both statutes since the test was whether the party would lose financially unless the issue was raised. Huffman v. Dawkins, 273 Ark. 520, 622 S.W.2d 159 (1981) (decision under prior law).

The legislature intended to make a statutory allowance for the joint use of the widow and minor children, regardless of the claims of creditors against the estate, and the statute of descent and distribution, therefore, does not apply to such an allowance. Moudy v. Bradley, 200 Ark. 630, 140 S.W.2d 113 (1940) (decision under prior law).

Act 714 of 1981, which created gender neutral awards of dower and curtesy under §28-39-401 and allowances under this section, is substantive rather than procedural and therefore should not be applied retroactively. Huffman v. Dawkins, 273 Ark. 520, 622 S.W.2d 159 (1981); Hall v. Hall, 274 Ark. 266, 623 S.W.2d 833 (1981), cert. denied, 456 U.S. 916, 102 S. Ct. 1770 (1982).

It is improper to enter an alternative money judgment against an administrator unless it is shown that the specific articles are not in the hands of the administrator at the time the judgment is rendered. Cash v. Cash, 67 Ark. 278, 54 S.W. 744 (1899) (decision under prior law).

The allowance to the widow of specific articles of her husband's estate, not exceeding $150 in value, based upon the appraisement made for the administrator, instead of upon an appraisement made at the instance of the widow, was an irregularity merely and not prejudicial to the administrator. Cash v. Cash, 67 Ark. 278, 54 S.W. 744 (1899) (decision under prior law).

In a probate case, a circuit court erred in awarding property that was titled solely in the corporate name to the spouse as part of her statutory allowances; this section is applicable to the personal estate of the decedent.Chandler v. Harris, 2016 Ark. App. 155, 485 S.W.3d 716 (2016).

Although a court did not order an estate vested in a widow, in a proceeding to compel her to account, she could show the value and avail herself of statutory benefits. Hampton v. Physick, 24 Ark. (11 Barber) 561 (1867) (decision under prior law).

An order of the probate court allowing administrator to pay to herself, as widow of the decedent, statutory allowances and in addition one-third of all personal property and one-third of the cash in a bank did not assume the force of a judgment which was affected, in any way, by a nunc pro tunc order. Moudy v. Bradley, 200 Ark. 630, 140 S.W.2d 113 (1940) (decision under prior law).

Where there was evidence to indicate that the estate may have included equity in an automobile, since the decedent had purchased the property, the administrator should have proceeded to pay for it from the assets of the estate, sold it as provided in §28-49-107, obtained authority to abandon it as permitted under §28-49-106, or applied to the court for assignment of it to her as part of her statutory allowance under this section, as she was accountable for it, either by accounting under the Probate Code or for conversion under §28-49-105. Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973).

Estate taxes, under the provisions of §26-59-115 [repealed], were to be deducted from the property belonging to the widow as dower and allowance and as surviving tenant of the estate by the entirety as well as from the other assets. Terral v. Terral, 212 Ark. 221, 205 S.W.2d 198 (1947) (decision under prior law).

In estimating the amount of a widow's dower in personalty, the whole personal estate must be taken into consideration, including property taken under statutory provisions for special allowances. Sharp v. Himes, 129 Ark. 327, 196 S.W. 131 (1917) (decision under prior law).

Although the administrator asserted that the only personal property of the estate was household furnishings, title to which vested in her under this section, without an inventory the court was in no position to determine whether all of the items claimed fell within the purview of allowances to the widow and minor children in order to make an appropriate assignment to them. Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973).

The probate court did not have jurisdiction to order payment of a statutory allowance from a bank account held in the name of the decedent or her son, who died a few months after the death of the decedent, as the wife and son of the decedent's son, who claimed the bank account, were strangers to the estate. Smith v. Smith, 338 Ark. 526, 998 S.W.2d 745 (1999).

A claim for widow's allowances filed more than 12 years after an administrator was appointed and nearly five months after the administrator's death, long after all personal estate had been used to pay debts and claims, was properly denied. Walls v. Phillips, 204 Ark. 365, 162 S.W.2d 59 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Where a husband disposed of all of his property by will without mention as to his widow's statutory allowances, the widow was entitled to these allowances, but where she did not ask for them while the executor had in his hands money to pay them and permitted him to expend the money in the payment of debts and expenses of administration, she was entitled only to such sum as the executor had on hand. Wofford v. James, 204 Ark. 700, 163 S.W.2d 710 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Although a marriage settlement was made in lieu of dower and homestead rights, it did not require a widow to waive her statutory rights, and she was entitled to both these allowances and their value. Masterson v. Masterson, 200 Ark. 193, 139 S.W.2d 30 (1940) (decision under prior law).

Former statute did not require the appointment of a guardian for minor children to protect their interest in the allowance. Young v. Lowe, 148 Ark. 129, 229 S.W. 4 (1921) (decision under prior law).

Where there is a widow and a minor child and the widow does not have the care and custody of the child and is not its guardian, the widow and child are to share equally in the allowance and she cannot appropriate it to her own use to the exclusion of the minor. Moudy v. Bradley, 200 Ark. 630, 140 S.W.2d 113 (1940) (decision under prior law).

Allowances to a widow are in addition to dower. Ex parte Grooms, 102 Ark. 322, 143 S.W. 1063 (1912); Sharp v. Himes, 129 Ark. 327, 196 S.W. 131 (1917); Costen v. Fricke, 169 Ark. 572, 276 S.W. 579 (1925) (decision under prior law).

Statutory allowances held personal to the widow. Walls v. Phillips, 204 Ark. 365, 162 S.W.2d 59 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Statutory allowance of $1,000 (now $2,000) to surviving spouse held personal and for her benefit and therefore would not pass to her heirs, even though she was insane, from her husband's death until her own. Jeffcoat v. Harper, 224 Ark. 778, 276 S.W.2d 429 (1955) (decision under prior law).

The proceeding of a probate court to declare the estate in a widow is “in rem”, and notice to the heirs is not necessary. Harrison v. Lamar, 33 Ark. 824 (1878) (decision under prior law).

Former statute operated only on the personal property of a deceased, and so the widow of a member of the insolvent partnership was not entitled to statutory allowance out of the personal property of the partnership. McLerkin v. Schilling, 192 Ark. 1083, 96 S.W.2d 445 (1936) (decision under prior law).

Value of personal estate only is to be considered in determining whether it may be vested in a widow or minor children. Wilson v. Massie, 70 Ark. 25, 65 S.W. 942 (1901) (decision under prior law).

An order of a probate court vesting land of a decedent, of value less than $300, in the widow was void. Calhoun v. Moore, 79 Ark. 109, 94 S.W. 931 (1906) (decision under prior law).

The allowance must be made out of the personal property and not from proceeds of real estate. Kitchens v. Jones, 87 Ark. 502, 113 S.W. 29 (1908) (decision under prior law).

A widow was not barred from having the proceeds of a sale of husband's estate vested in her because of failure to have the estate appraised and make a claim for allowance before the sale. Henry v. Tillar, 70 Ark. 246, 67 S.W. 310 (1902) (decision under prior law).

Where testator's property at death consisted of both personalty and realty, the will directed that the realty be sold and converted into cash, and the widow elected to take against the will and consented to the sale of the realty, the widow's allowance was limited to $1,000 (now $2,000), or the value of the personalty, whichever is the lesser. Atkinson v. Van Echaute, 236 Ark. 423, 366 S.W.2d 273 (1963) (decision under prior law).

Where a widow elects to take under law, and not under will, she takes as though husband had died intestate, without will, and she is entitled to dower, homestead, and other allowances. Jameson v. Jameson, 117 Ark. 142, 173 S.W. 851 (1915); Cypert v. McEuen, 172 Ark. 437, 288 S.W. 923 (1926) (decision under prior law).

Where a testator left only homestead and less than $300 in personal property and widow timely renounced the will and elected to take under a former statute, unappealed order of the probate court, having the effect of setting aside the realty to her and infant child as their homestead, entitled the widow to possession of the homestead even after her remarriage, though the will provided that, in such event, the property should go to the children. Lauck v. Burnett, 192 Ark. 547, 93 S.W.2d 129 (1936) (decision under prior law).

A widow lost no right and was not barred from having proceeds of the sale of the husband's estate vested in her because of the failure to have appraisement made in 30 days or at all. Wilson v. Massie, 70 Ark. 25, 65 S.W. 942 (1901) (decision under prior law).

A widow was entitled to the articles specified unconditionally and against the rights of heirs and creditors. Hill's Adm'rs v. Mitchell, 5 Ark. (5 Pike) 608 (1844) (decision under prior law).

A widow's right to statutory allowances is not dependent upon her possession of any property of the estate. Lambert v. Tucker, 83 Ark. 416, 104 S.W. 131 (1907) (decision under prior law).

A widow who has elected to take under her husband's will is nevertheless entitled to take statutory allowances. Cypert v. McEuen, 172 Ark. 437, 288 S.W. 923 (1926); McEachin v. People's Nat'l Bank, 191 Ark. 544, 87 S.W.2d 12 (1935) (decision under prior law).

A probate court properly allowed to a widow one-third of the intestate's personal estate as well as a $300 allowance. Miller v. Oil City Iron Works, 184 Ark. 900, 45 S.W.2d 36 (1931) (decision under prior law).

A receipt signed by a widow for $100 paid to her by the testator upon execution of deeds to children did not affect the widow's right to statutory allowances. Spears v. Spears, 213 Ark. 15, 209 S.W.2d 105 (1948) (decision under prior law).

A widow's allowances are not extinguished by a release of dower and homestead rights. Spears v. Spears, 213 Ark. 15, 209 S.W.2d 105 (1948) (decision under prior law).

A widow is entitled to allowances under subsection (b) of this section although she also receives allowances under subsections (a) and (c). Horn v. Horn, 228 Ark. 948, 311 S.W.2d 311 (1958).

A widow was entitled to support of $500 (now $1,000), statutory allowance of $1,000 (now $4,000) and household goods as against distributees although she would have only been entitled to statutory allowance of $500 (now $2,000) as against complaining creditor. Wilson v. Davis, 239 Ark. 305, 389 S.W.2d 442 (1965) (decision under prior law).

A widow, either as such or as executor of her husband's estate, was not entitled to payment of subsidy under Soil Conservation Act that had been properly assigned by her husband. Oldham v. Wright, 202 Ark. 1049, 155 S.W.2d 50 (1941) (decision under prior law).

In a probate case, because no final distribution had been made and possession of personal property was still vested with a personal representative, a spouse's request for her statutory allowances under this section was timely.Chandler v. Harris, 2016 Ark. App. 155, 485 S.W.3d 716 (2016).

The law vests an estate. Harrison v. Lamar, 33 Ark. 824 (1878) (decision under prior law).

When an estate was less than $300, it vested in the widow and minor children and was exempt from administration proceedings. Bertig v. Higgins, 89 Ark. 70, 115 S.W. 935 (1909) (decision under prior law).

An estate which did not exceed $300 in value vested absolutely in a widow and children free from creditor's claims. Jerry v. Sturdivant, 136 Ark. 624, 203 S.W. 694 (1918) (decision under prior law).

Section 28-11-204, which provides that when one spouse kills the other and is convicted of murder the spouse convicted shall not be “endowed” in the estate of the decedent, is intended to apply only to dower and curtesy and does not apply to a claim for a widow's statutory allowance under such circumstances. However, apart from such statute, the principle that one who wrongfully kills another will not be permitted to share in the other's estate or otherwise profit from the crime will apply to such a situation. Smith v. Dean, 226 Ark. 438, 290 S.W.2d 439 (1956), overruled, Zinger v. Terrell, 336 Ark. 423, 985 S.W.2d 737 (Ark. 1999).

Cited: Robinson v. Shivley, 234 Ark. 222, 351 S.W.2d 449 (1961); Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975); Owen v. Owen, 267 Ark. 532, 592 S.W.2d 120 (1980).

History.

Acts 1965, No. 381, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2131 — 62-2133.